Hawaii, session 2026, SB950.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that children and families who are referred to child welfare services undergo a significant amount of trauma.  Families and children can be retraumatized if the system they are referred to is not trauma informed.  According to The National Child Traumatic Stress Network, trauma-informed care occurs when all parties involved recognize and respond to the impact of traumatic stress on those who have contact with the organization, including children, caregivers, and service providers. The legislature further finds the malama ohana working group has submitted a report that provides recommendations to create transformative changes to the State's existing child welfare system, including having all child welfare services branch staff in the department of human services receive comprehensive trauma-informed care training as part of developing a trauma-informed system. The legislature also finds that, in order for an organization to fully adopt a trauma-informed approach, there must be policies and practices that address the needs of the staff, including the effects of vicarious trauma, secondary traumatic stress, and burnout. The legislature finds that Act 291, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, established on a temporary basis the office of wellness and resilience within the office of the governor.  The office was established to address the various barriers that impact the physical, social, and emotional well-being of all people in the State by building wellness and resilience through trauma-informed, strength-based strategies.  The office's duties also include supporting state agencies in their individual efforts to address trauma-informed care and move toward a collaborative, purpose-driven collective system reform. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the office of wellness and resilience to support the development of a trauma-informed child welfare system in the State. SECTION 2. (a)  The office of wellness and resilience shall design, implement, and administer trauma-informed organizational assessments and a training curriculum for the child welfare services branch of the social services division of the department of human services.  The organizational assessments and training curriculum shall include: (1)  An evidence-based assessment tool to guide child welfare services' assessment of its policies and procedures in the context of best serving children and families who have experienced trauma; (2)  An evidence-based assessment tool to measure how child welfare services addresses worker well-being, including the effects of vicarious trauma, secondary traumatic stress, and burnout for all child welfare services staff; (3)  A training curriculum for the establishment of a cohort of trained mentors to provide guidance; (4)  A branch-wide trauma-informed care curriculum accompanied by ongoing technical assistance; (5)  Specialized trauma-informed supervisor training and technical assistance to ensure sustainable implementation of the curriculum; and (6)  A child welfare services expert to consult on the implementation of the assessments' findings. (b) The office of wellness and resilience may contract with other public or private entities to design, implement, and administer the trauma-informed organizational assessments and training curriculum required pursuant to this section. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $425,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the office of wellness and resilience to design, implement, and administer trauma-informed organizational assessments and a training curriculum to support the development of a trauma-informed child welfare system in the State, including contracting with public or private entity to provide necessary services. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the office of wellness and resilience for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________